California statutes. Civil Code
(1) A mortgage, deed of trust, or other encumbrance that attaches after commencement of the site improvement.

(2) A mortgage, deed of trust, or other encumbrance that was
 unrecorded at the commencement of the site improvement and of which the claimant had no notice.

(3) A mortgage, deed of trust, or other encumbrance that was recorded before commencement of the site improvement, if given for the sole or primary purpose of financing the site improvement. This subdivision does not apply if the loan proceeds are, in good faith, placed in the control of the lender pursuant to a binding agreement with the borrower to the effect that (A) the proceeds are to be applied to the payment of claimants and (B) no portion of the proceeds will be paid to the borrower in the absence of satisfactory evidence that all claims have been paid or that the time for recording a claim of lien has expired and no claim of lien has been recorded.

(b) A mortgage or deed of trust, otherwise subordinate under subdivision (a), has priority over a lien provided for in Section 8402
 if a payment bond in an amount not less than 50 percent of the principal amount of the mortgage or deed of trust is recorded before completion of the work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Enforcement of Lien [8460. - 8470.]

8460.

(a) The claimant shall commence an action to enforce a lien within 90 days after recordation of the claim of lien. If the claimant does not commence an action to enforce the lien within that time, the claim of lien expires and is unenforceable.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply if the claimant and owner agree to extend credit, and notice
 of the fact and terms of the extension of credit is recorded (1) within 90 days after recordation of the claim of lien or (2) more than 90 days after recordation of the claim of lien but before a purchaser or encumbrancer for value and in good faith acquires rights in the property. In that event the claimant shall commence an action to enforce the lien within 90 days after the expiration of the credit, but in no case later than one year after completion of the work of improvement. If the claimant does not commence an action to enforce the lien within that time, the claim of lien expires and is unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8461.

After commencement of an action to enforce a lien, the plaintiff shall record in the office of the county recorder of the county, or of the several counties in which the property is situated, a notice of the pendency of the action, as provided in Title 4.5 (commencing with Section 405) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, on or before 20 days after the commencement of the action. Only from the time of recording that
 notice shall a purchaser or encumbrancer of the property affected thereby be deemed to have constructive notice of the pendency of the action, and in that event only of its pendency against parties designated by their real names.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8462.

Notwithstanding Section 583.420 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if an action to enforce a lien is not brought to trial within two years after commencement of the action, the court may in its discretion dismiss the action for want of prosecution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8464.

In addition to any other costs allowed by law, the court in an action to enforce a lien shall allow as costs to each claimant whose lien is established the amount paid to verify and record the claim of lien, whether the claimant is a plaintiff or defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8466.

If there is a deficiency of proceeds from the sale of property on a judgment for enforcement of a lien, a deficiency judgment may be entered against a party personally liable for the deficiency in the same manner and with the same effect as in an action to foreclose a mortgage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8468.

(a) This chapter does not affect any of the following rights of a claimant:

(1) The right to maintain a personal action to recover a debt against the person liable, either in a separate action or in an action to enforce a lien.

(2) The right to a writ of attachment. In an
 application for a writ of attachment, the claimant shall refer to this section. The claimant’s recording of a claim of lien does not affect the right to a writ of attachment.

(3) The right to enforce a judgment.

(b) A judgment obtained by the claimant in a personal action described in subdivision (a) does not impair or merge the claim of lien, but any amount collected on the judgment shall be credited on the amount of the lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8470.

In an action to enforce a lien for work provided to a contractor:

(a) The contractor shall defend the action at the contractor’s own expense. During the pendency of the action the owner may withhold from the direct contractor the amount of the lien claim.

(b) If the judgment in the action is
 against the owner or the owner’s property, the owner may deduct the amount of the judgment and costs from any amount owed to the direct contractor. If the amount of the judgment and costs exceeds the amount owed to the direct contractor, or if the owner has settled with the direct contractor in full, the owner may recover from the direct contractor, or the sureties on a bond given by the direct contractor for faithful performance of the direct contract, the amount of the judgment and costs that exceed the contract price and for which the direct contractor was originally liable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Release Order [8480. - 8488.]

8480.

(a) The owner of property or the owner of any interest in property subject to a claim of lien may petition the court for an order to release the property from the claim of lien if the claimant has not commenced an action to enforce the lien within the time provided in Section 8460.

(b) This article does not bar any other cause of action
 or claim for relief by the owner of the property. A release order does not bar any other cause of action or claim for relief by the claimant, other than an action to enforce the claim of lien that is the subject of the release order.

(c) A petition for a release order under this article may be joined with a pending action to enforce the claim of lien that is the subject of the petition. No other action or claim for relief may be joined with a petition under this article.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 8056, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1141.10) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not apply to a proceeding under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.

An owner of property may not petition the court for a release order under this article unless at least 10 days before filing the petition the owner gives the claimant notice demanding that the claimant execute and record a release of the claim of lien. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1, and shall state the grounds for the demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.

A petition for a release order shall be verified and shall allege all of the following:

(a) The date of recordation of the claim of lien. A certified copy of the claim of lien shall be attached to the petition.

(b) The county in which the claim of lien is recorded.

(c) The book and page or series number of the place in the official records where the claim of lien is recorded.

(d) The legal description of the property subject to the claim of lien.

(e) Whether an extension of credit has been granted under Section 8460, if so to what date, and that the time for commencement of an action to enforce the lien has expired.

(f) That the owner has given the claimant notice under Section 8482 demanding that the claimant execute and record a release of the lien and that the claimant is unable or unwilling to do so or cannot with reasonable diligence be found.

(g) Whether an action to enforce the lien is pending.

(h) Whether the owner of the property or interest in the property has filed for relief in bankruptcy or there is another restraint that prevents the claimant from commencing an action to enforce the lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8486.

(a) On the filing of a petition for a release order, the clerk shall set a hearing date. The date shall be not more than 30 days after the filing of the petition. The court may continue the hearing only on a showing of good cause, but in any event the court shall rule and make any necessary orders on the petition not later than 60 days after the filing of the petition.

(b) The petitioner shall serve a copy of the petition and a notice of hearing on the claimant at least 15 days before the hearing. Service shall be made in the same manner as service of summons, or by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, addressed to the claimant as provided in Section 8108.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 8116, when service is made by mail, service is complete on the fifth day following deposit of the petition and notice in the mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8488.

(a) At the hearing both (1) the petition and (2) the issue of compliance with the service and date for hearing requirements of this article are deemed controverted by the claimant. The petitioner has the initial burden of producing evidence on those matters. The petitioner has the burden of proof as to the issue of compliance with the service and date for hearing requirements of this article. The
 claimant has the burden of proof as to the validity of the lien.

(b) If judgment is in favor of the petitioner, the court shall order the property released from the claim of lien.

(c) The prevailing party is entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Removal of Claim of Lien from Record [8490. - 8494.]

8490.

(a) A court order dismissing a cause of action to enforce a lien or releasing property from a claim of lien, or a judgment that no lien exists, shall include all of the following information:

(1) The date of recordation of the claim of lien.

(2) The county in which the claim
 of lien is recorded.

(3) The book and page or series number of the place in the official records where the claim of lien is recorded.

(4) The legal description of the property.

(b) A court order or judgment under this section is equivalent to cancellation of the claim of lien and its removal from the record.

(c) A court order or judgment under this section is a recordable instrument. On recordation of a certified copy of the court order or judgment, the property described in the order or judgment is released from the claim of lien.

(d) This section does not apply to a court order dismissing an action to enforce a lien that is expressly stated to be without prejudice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8494.

If a claim of lien expires and is unenforceable under Section 8460, or if a court order or judgment is recorded under Section 8490, the claim of lien does not constitute actual or constructive notice of any of the matters contained, claimed, alleged, or contended in the claim of lien, or create a duty of inquiry in any person thereafter dealing with the affected property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Stop Payment Notice [8500. - 8560.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8500. - 8510.]

8500.

The rights of all persons furnishing work for any work of improvement, with respect to any fund for payment of construction costs, are governed exclusively by this chapter, and no person may assert any legal or equitable right with respect to the fund, other than a right created by a written contract between that person and the person holding the fund, except pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

(a) A stop payment notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1, and shall be signed and verified by the claimant.

(b) The notice shall include a general description of work to be provided, and an estimate of the total amount in value of the work to be provided.

(c) The amount claimed in the notice may include only the amount due the claimant for work provided through the date of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

A claimant that willfully gives a false stop payment notice or that willfully includes in the notice a demand to withhold for work that has not been provided forfeits all right to participate in the distribution of the funds withheld and all right to a lien under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.

(a) A stop payment notice to an owner shall be given to the owner or to the owner’s architect, if any.

(b) A stop payment notice to a construction lender holding construction funds shall not be effective unless given to the manager or other responsible officer or person at the office or branch of the lender administering or holding the
 construction funds.

(c) A stop payment notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8508.

A stop payment notice is not valid unless both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The claimant gave preliminary notice to the extent required by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200).

(b) The claimant gave the stop payment notice before expiration of the time within which a claim
 of lien must be recorded under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8510.

(a) A person may obtain release of funds withheld pursuant to a stop payment notice by giving the person withholding the funds a release bond.

(b) A release bond shall be given by an admitted surety insurer and shall be conditioned for payment of any amount not exceeding the penal obligation of the bond that the claimant recovers on the
 claim, together with costs of suit awarded in the action. The bond shall be in an amount equal to 125 percent of the amount claimed in the stop payment notice.

(c) On receipt of a release bond, the person withholding funds pursuant to the stop payment notice shall release them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Stop Payment Notice to Owner [8520. - 8522.]

8520.

(a) A person that has a lien right under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400), other than a direct contractor, may give the owner a stop payment notice.

(b) The owner may give notice, in compliance with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1, demanding that a person that has a lien right under Chapter
 4 (commencing with Section 8400) give the owner a stop payment notice. If the person fails to give the owner a bonded or unbonded stop payment notice, the person forfeits the right to a lien under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8522.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on receipt of a stop payment notice an owner shall withhold from the direct contractor or from any person acting under authority of a direct contractor a sufficient amount due or to become due to the direct contractor to pay the claim stated in the notice.

(b) The owner may, but is not required
 to, withhold funds if the owner has previously recorded a payment bond under Section 8600. If the owner does not withhold funds, the owner shall, within 30 days after receipt of the stop payment notice, give notice to the claimant that a payment bond has been recorded and provide the claimant a copy of the bond. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Stop Payment Notice to Construction Lender [8530. - 8538.]

8530.

A person that has a lien right under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) may give a construction lender a stop payment notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8532.

A claimant may give a construction lender a stop payment notice accompanied by a bond in an amount equal to 125 percent of the amount of the claim. The bond shall be conditioned that if the defendant recovers judgment in an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in the stop payment notice or to enforce a claim of lien recorded by the claimant, the claimant will pay all costs that are awarded the owner, direct
 contractor, or construction lender, and all damages to the owner, direct contractor, or construction lender that result from the stop payment notice or recordation of the claim of lien, not exceeding the amount of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8534.

(a) A construction lender that objects to the sufficiency of sureties on the bond given with a bonded stop payment notice shall give notice to the claimant of the objection, within 20 days after the bonded stop payment notice is given. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(b) The claimant may within 10 days after notice of the objection is given substitute for the initial bond a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer. If the claimant does not substitute a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, the construction lender may disregard the bonded stop payment notice and release all funds withheld in response to that notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8536.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on receipt of a stop payment notice a construction lender shall withhold from the borrower or other person to whom the lender or the owner is obligated to make payments or advancement out of the construction fund sufficient funds to pay the claim stated in the notice.

(b) The construction lender
 may, at its option, elect not to withhold funds in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The stop payment notice is unbonded.

(2) The stop payment notice is given by a claimant other than a direct contractor, and a payment bond is recorded before the lender is given any stop payment notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8538.

(a) The claimant may make a written request for notice of an election by the construction lender under Section 8536 not to withhold funds. The request shall be made at the time the claimant gives the construction lender the stop payment notice and shall be accompanied by a preaddressed, stamped envelope.

(b) If the construction lender
 elects not to withhold funds under Section 8536, the lender shall, within 30 days after making the election, give notice of that fact to a claimant who has requested notice of the election under subdivision (a). The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1. If the basis of the election is the recordation of a payment bond under Section 8600, the construction lender shall include a copy of the bond with the notice.

(c) A construction lender is not liable for failure to include a copy of the bond with the notice under this section if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The failure was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error.

(2) The lender maintains reasonable procedures to avoid an error of that type.

(3) The lender corrected the error not later than 20 days after the date the lender discovered the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Priorities [8540. - 8544.]

8540.

(a) Funds withheld pursuant to a stop payment notice shall be distributed in the following order of priority:

(1) First, to pay claims of persons that have given a bonded stop payment notice. If funds are insufficient to pay the claims of those persons in full, the funds shall be distributed pro rata among the claimants in the ratio that
 the claim of each bears to the aggregate of all claims for which a bonded stop payment notice is given.

(2) Second, to pay claims of persons that have given an unbonded stop payment notice. If funds are insufficient to pay the claims of those persons in full, the funds shall be distributed among the claimants in the ratio that the claim of each bears to the aggregate of all claims for which an unbonded stop payment notice is given.

(b) Pro rata distribution under this section shall be made among the persons entitled to share in the distribution without regard to the order in which the person has given a stop payment notice or commenced an enforcement action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8542.

Notwithstanding Section 8540:

(a) If funds are withheld pursuant to a stop payment notice given to a construction lender by a direct contractor or subcontractor, the direct contractor or subcontractor may recover only the net amount due the direct contractor or subcontractor after deducting any funds that are withheld by the construction lender pursuant to the
 claims of subcontractors and material suppliers that have given a stop payment notice for work done on behalf of the direct contractor or subcontractor.

(b) In no event is the construction lender required to withhold, pursuant to a stop payment notice, more than the net amount provided in subdivision (a). Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a construction lender is not liable for failure to withhold more than that net amount on receipt of a stop payment notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8544.

The rights of a claimant who gives a construction lender a stop payment notice are not affected by an assignment of construction loan funds made by the owner or direct contractor, and the stop payment notice has priority over the assignment, whether the assignment is made before or after the stop payment notice is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement of Claim Stated in Stop Payment Notice [8550. - 8560.]

8550.

(a) A claimant shall commence an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in a stop payment notice at any time after 10 days from the date the claimant gives the stop payment notice.

(b) A claimant shall commence an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in a stop payment notice not later than 90 days after expiration of the
 time within which a stop payment notice must be given.

(c) An action under this section may not be brought to trial or judgment entered before expiration of the time provided in subdivision (b).

(d) If a claimant does not commence an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in a stop payment notice within the time prescribed in subdivision (b), the notice ceases to be effective and the person withholding funds pursuant to the notice shall release them.

(e) Within five days after commencement of an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in a stop payment notice, the claimant shall give notice of commencement of the action to the persons to whom the stop payment notice was given. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.

If more than one claimant has given a stop payment notice:

(a) Any number of claimants may join in the same enforcement action.

(b) If claimants commence separate actions, the court first acquiring jurisdiction may order the actions consolidated.

(c) On motion of the owner or construction lender the court shall require all claimants to be impleaded in one action, to the end that the rights of all parties may be adjudicated in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8554.

Notwithstanding Section 583.420 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in a stop payment notice is not brought to trial within two years after commencement of the action, the court may in its discretion dismiss the action for want of prosecution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8556.

A stop payment notice ceases to be effective, and a person withholding funds pursuant to the notice shall release them, in either of the following circumstances:

(a) An action to enforce payment of the claim stated in the stop payment notice is dismissed, unless expressly stated to be without prejudice.

(b) Judgment in an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in the stop payment notice is against the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8558.

(a) In an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in a bonded stop payment notice, the prevailing party is entitled to a reasonable attorney’s fee in addition to costs and damages.

(b) The court, on notice and motion by a party, shall determine who is the prevailing party or that there is no prevailing party for the purpose of this
 section, regardless of whether the action proceeds to final judgment. The prevailing party is the party that recovers greater relief in the action, subject to the following limitations:

(1) If the action is voluntarily dismissed or dismissed pursuant to a settlement, there is no prevailing party.

(2) If the defendant tenders to the claimant the full amount to which the claimant is entitled, and deposits in court for the claimant the amount so tendered, and alleges those facts in the answer and the allegation is determined to be true, the defendant is deemed to be the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8560.

If the claimant is the prevailing party in an action to enforce payment of the claim stated in a bonded stop payment notice, any amount awarded on the claim shall include interest at the legal rate calculated from the date the stop payment notice is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Payment Bond [8600. - 8614.]

8600.

(a) This section applies if, before the commencement of work, the owner in good faith files a direct contract with the county recorder, and records a payment bond of the direct contractor in an amount not less than 50 percent of the price stated in the direct contract.

(b) If the conditions of subdivision (a) are satisfied, the court shall,
where equitable to do so, restrict lien enforcement under this title to the aggregate amount due from the owner to the direct contractor and shall enter judgment against the direct contractor and surety on the bond for any deficiency that remains between the amount due to the direct contractor and the whole amount due to claimants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

Section 8600 does not preclude an owner from requiring a performance bond, payment bond, or other security as protection against a direct contractor’s failure to perform the direct contract or to make full payment for all work provided pursuant to the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8604.

(a) If a lending institution requires that a payment bond be given as a condition of lending money to finance a work of improvement, and accepts in writing as sufficient a bond given in fulfillment of the requirement, the lending institution may not thereafter object to the borrower as to the validity of the bond or refuse to make the loan based on an objection to the bond if the bond is given by an
admitted surety insurer.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “lending institution” includes a commercial bank, savings and loan institution, credit union, or other organization or person engaged in the business of financing loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8606.

(a) A payment bond under this title shall be conditioned for the payment in full of the claims of all claimants and shall by its terms inure to the benefit of all claimants so as to give a claimant a right of action to enforce the liability on the bond. The bond shall be given by an admitted surety insurer.

(b) An owner, direct contractor,
or subcontractor may be the principal on the bond.

(c) A claimant may enforce the liability on the bond in an action to enforce a lien under this part or in a separate action on the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8608.

(a) This title does not give a claimant a right to recover on a direct contractor’s payment bond given under this chapter unless the claimant provided work to the direct contractor either directly or through one or more subcontractors, pursuant to a direct contract.

(b) Nothing in this section affects the stop payment notice right of, and
relative priorities among, design professionals and holders of secured interests in the real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8609.

Any provision in a payment bond attempting by contract to shorten the period prescribed in Section 337 of the Code of Civil Procedure for the commencement of an action on the bond shall not be valid under either of the following circumstances:

(a) If the provision attempts to limit the time for commencement of an action on the bond to a shorter period than six
months from the completion of any work of improvement.

(b) As applied to any action brought by a claimant, unless the bond is recorded before the work of improvement is commenced.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.

Notwithstanding Section 8609, if a payment bond under this title is recorded before completion of a work of improvement, an action to enforce the liability on the bond may not be commenced later than six months after completion of the work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8612.

(a) In order to enforce a claim against a payment bond under this title, a claimant shall give the preliminary notice provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200).

(b) If preliminary notice was not given as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200), a claimant may enforce a claim by giving written notice to the surety
and the bond principal within 15 days after recordation of a notice of completion. If no notice of completion has been recorded, the time for giving written notice to the surety and the bond principal is extended to 75 days after completion of the work of improvement.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2012, and except as provided in subdivision (b), if the preliminary notice was required to be given by a person who has no direct contractual relationship with the contractor, and who has not given notice as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200), that person may enforce a claim by giving written notice to the surety and the bond principal, as provided in Section 8614, within 15 days after recordation of a notice of completion. If no notice of completion has been recorded, the time for giving written notice to the surety and the bond principal is extended to 75 days after completion of the work of improvement.

(d) Subdivision (c) shall not apply in either of the following circumstances:

(1) All progress payments, except for those disputed in good faith, have been made to a subcontractor who has a direct contractual relationship with the general contractor to whom the claimant has provided materials or services.

(2) The subcontractor who has a direct contractual relationship with the general contractor to whom the claimant has provided materials or services has been terminated from the project pursuant to the contract, and all progress payments, except those disputed in good faith, have been made as of the termination date.

(e) Pursuant to Section 8200, this section shall not apply to a laborer, as defined under Section 8024.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   (SB 293)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 105, and this section's own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8614.

Notice to the principal and surety under Section 8612 shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Security for Large Project [8700. - 8730.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application of Chapter [8700. - 8704.]

8700.

(a) This chapter applies if any of the following conditions is satisfied:
